Hawaii statutes.
§172-6 Proof. The award by the board
of commissioners to quiet land titles, together with a certificate by the
department of land and natural resources of the date and amount of the
appraisement and the amount of the government's commutation determined thereon,
and that the same has not been paid, together with the certificate of the clerk
of publication as hereinbefore provided, shall be prima facie proof of the
right of the government to the commutation claimed. [L 1909, c 90, §6; RL 1925,
§575; RL 1935, §1606; RL 1945, §4636; RL 1955, §100-6; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §172-6]

Case Notes

History of land titles under the Kingdom discussed. 6 H. 63.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next